Nebraska, session 109, LB1119.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1119 LB1119
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 87-1301, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
87-1301 Sections 87-1301 to 87-1309 and sections 3 and 4 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code
Act.
Sec. 2. Section 87-1302, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
87-1302 For purposes of the Age-Appropriate Online Design Code Act:
(1) Actual knowledge includes all information and inferences known
to the covered online service relating to the age of the individual,
including, but not limited to, self-identified age, and any age the
covered online service has attributed or associated with the individual
for any purpose, including marketing, advertising, or product
development. If a covered online service's classification of an
individual for purposes of marketing or advertising is inconsistent with
the individual's self-identified age, a covered online service shall
disregard self-identified age for purposes of the act;
(2) Child means an individual younger than thirteen years of age;
(3) Covered design feature means any feature or component of a
covered online service that will encourage or increase the frequency,
time spent, or activity of a user on the covered online service and
includes:
(a) Infinite scroll or a design feature where content automatically
and continuously loads at the bottom of a screen, other than what the
user explicitly prompted, requested, or searched for;
(b) Auto-playing video or audio, or a design feature in which a
video or audio automatically begins playing when a user navigates to or
scrolls through a set of videos without any explicit action on the part
of a user indicating the user's desire to watch that specific video or
listen to that audio;
(c) Quantification of engagement, including, but not limited to,
-2-

LB1119 LB1119
2026 2026
providing a visible count of how many likes, comments, clicks, views, or
reactions a user-generated item has received;
(d) Gamification, or a design feature that emulates gameplay,
including, but not limited to, a streak, badge, or reward that motivates
or causes more frequent or more extensive use of an online service
through incentives or frequency of use;
(e) The use of clustering, timing, or volume of notifications or
push alerts, irrespective of content;
(f) A design feature in which virtual currencies are used or where
digital items are purchased;
(g) Image-altering filters or a design feature that facilitates a
false perception of an image;
(h) Requiring or repeatedly prompting for account creation in order
to access publicly available user-generated content;
(i) Using ephemerality to prompt the urgent use of an online
service;
(j) Creating barriers to deleting an account or to removing
connections to other users of the service; or
(k) A feature that increases usage through the illusion of talking
with a human being that seeks to elicit feelings of intimacy from the
user;
(a) Infinite scroll;
(b) Rewards or incentives for frequency of visits or time spent on
the covered online service;
(c) Notifications or push alerts;
(d) In-game purchases; or
(e) Appearance-altering filters;
(4) Covered minor means a user that a covered online service knows
to be a minor;
(5)(a) Covered online service means a sole proprietorship, a limited
liability company, a corporation, an association, or any other legal
-3-

LB1119 LB1119
2026 2026
entity that owns, operates, controls, or provides an online service that:
(i) Conducts business in this state;
(ii) Alone, or jointly with its affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent
companies, determines the purposes and means of the processing of
consumers' personal data; and
(iii) Satisfies at least one of the following:
(A) (iii) Has annual gross revenue in excess of twenty-five million
dollars, adjusted every odd-numbered year to reflect changes in the
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the Federal
Bureau of Labor Statistics for the two-year period preceding the
adjustment date. The amount shall be rounded to the next highest one-
thousand-dollar amount; or
(B) (iv) Annually processes buys, receives, sells, or shares the
personal data of fifty thousand or more consumers, households, or
devices, alone or in combination with its affiliates, subsidiaries, or
parent companies. ; and
(v) Derives at least fifty percent of its annual revenue from the
sale or sharing of consumers' personal data.
(b) A covered online service includes:
(i) An entity that controls or is controlled by a business that
meets the definition of covered online service if the entity and business
share a name, service mark, or trademark that would cause a reasonable
consumer to understand that the entity and business are commonly owned;
and
(ii) For a covered online service that is a joint venture or
partnership, any person with an ownership interest of forty percent or
more in such venture or partnership.
(c) A covered online service does not include an online service with
actual knowledge that fewer than two percent of its users are minors,
provided that, in making such assessment, an online service shall not be
required to collect personal data of users, and if an online service
-4-

LB1119 LB1119
2026 2026
collects personal data of users for such purpose, it shall not use such
personal data for other purposes and shall delete such personal data
after using it to make the assessment;
(6) Dark pattern means a user interface designed or manipulated with
the effect of substantially subverting or impairing user autonomy,
decisionmaking, or choice. Dark pattern includes any practice determined
to be a dark pattern by the Federal Trade Commission as of January 1,
2024;
(7) Knows to be a child or knows to be a minor means actual
knowledge that the user is a child or minor, as applicable;
(8) Minor means an individual younger than eighteen years of age;
(9) Online service means any service, product, or feature that is
accessible to the public via the Internet, including a website or
application. An online service does not include any of the following:
(a) A telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. 153;
(b) A broadband Internet access service as defined in 47 C.F.R.
8.1(b); or
(c) The sale, delivery, or use of a physical device;
(10) Parent has the same meaning as in the federal Children's Online
Privacy Protection Act of 1998, 15 U.S.C. 6501 et seq., and the Federal
Trade Commission rules implementing such act;
(11) Personal data means any information, including derived data and
unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in
combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable
individual or to a device that identifies, is linked to, or is reasonably
linkable to one or more identified or identifiable individuals in a
household. Personal data does not include publicly available data;
(12) Personalized recommendation system means a fully or partially
automated system used to suggest, promote, or rank content, including
other users, hashtags, or posts, based on the personal data of users;
(13) Precise geolocation information means any data that identifies
-5-

LB1119 LB1119
2026 2026
within a radius of one thousand seven hundred fifty feet a covered
minor's present or past location or the present or past location of a
device that links or is linkable to a covered minor or any data that is
derived from a device that is used or intended to be used to locate a
covered minor within a radius of one thousand seven hundred fifty feet by
means of technology that includes a global positioning system that
provides latitude and longitude coordinates. Precise geolocation
information does not include the content of communications or any data
generated or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure
systems or equipment for use by a utility;
(14) Process means to perform an operation or set of operations by
manual or automated means on personal data. Process includes collecting,
using, storing, disclosing, sharing, analyzing, deleting, or modifying
personal data;
(15) Profile means any form of automated processing of personal data
to evaluate, analyze, or predict certain aspects relating to a covered
minor, including a covered minor's economic situation, health, personal
preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements;
(16) Publicly available data means data (a) that is lawfully made
available from federal, state, or local government records, (b) that a
business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to
the general public by the individual or from widely distributed media, or
(c) that is made available by a person to whom the individual has
disclosed the data if the individual has not restricted the data to a
specific audience. Publicly available data does not mean biometric data
collected by a covered online service about a covered minor without the
covered minor's knowledge;
(17) Targeted advertising means displaying advertisements to an
individual when the advertisement is selected based on personal data
obtained or inferred from that individual's activities over time and
across nonaffiliated websites or online applications to predict the
-6-

LB1119 LB1119
2026 2026
individual's preferences or interest. Targeted advertising does not
include:
(a) Advertisements based on activities within a covered online
service's own Internet websites or online applications;
(b) Advertisements based on the context of an individual's current
search query, visit to an Internet website, or use of an online
application;
(c) Advertisements directed to an individual in response to the
individual's request for information or feedback; or
(d) Processing personal data solely to measure or report advertising
frequency, performance, or reach; and
(18) User means, with respect to a covered online service, an
individual who registers an account or creates a profile on the covered
online service.
Sec. 3. A covered online service shall not:
(1) Provide a covered minor with a single setting that makes all of
the default privacy settings less protective at once; or
(2) Request or prompt a covered minor to make the covered minor's
privacy settings less protective, unless the change is strictly necessary
for the covered minor to access a service or feature that such covered
minor has expressly and unambiguously requested.
Sec. 4. A covered online service shall:
(1) Provide a prominent, accessible, and responsive tool to allow a
covered minor to request that the covered minor's account be unpublished
or deleted; and
(2) Honor a request under subdivision (1) of this section no later
than fifteen days after the covered online service receives the request.
Sec. 5. Section 87-1305, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
87-1305 (1) A covered online service shall only collect and use the
minimum amount of a covered minor's personal data necessary to provide
-7-

LB1119 LB1119
2026 2026
the specific elements of an online service with which the covered minor
has knowingly engaged. Such personal data shall not be used for reasons
other than those for which it was collected.
(2) A covered online service shall not be required to collect the
personal data of a user to comply with the Age-Appropriate Online Design
Code Act. A covered online service that collects personal data of a user
for age verification cannot use such personal data for other purposes and
shall delete such personal data after use for age verification.
(3) A covered online service shall only retain the personal data of
a covered minor as long as necessary to provide the specific elements of
an online service with which the covered minor has knowingly engaged.
(4) A covered online service shall not facilitate targeted
advertising to a covered minor.
(5) A covered online service shall provide an obvious sign to a
covered minor when precise geolocation information is being collected or
used.
(6) The use of notifications and push alerts to a covered minor is
prohibited between the hours of 10 p.m. and 6 a.m. and between the hours
of 8 a.m. and 4 p.m. on week days during the school year in the covered
minor's local time zone.
(7) A covered online service shall not profile a covered minor
unless profiling is necessary to provide a covered online service
requested by such covered minor, and only with respect to the aspects of
the covered online service with which the covered minor is actively and
knowingly engaged.
(8) A covered online service shall ensure that the default settings
for the protections required pursuant to this section are set at the
highest protection available for the safety of the covered minor.
(9) If a covered online service allows parental monitoring, the
covered online service shall provide an obvious signal to a covered minor
when such minor is being monitored.
-8-

LB1119 LB1119
2026 2026
Sec. 6. Section 87-1308, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
87-1308 (1) A covered online service is prohibited from facilitating
advertisements for prohibited products, such as narcotic drugs, tobacco
products, gambling, and alcohol, to covered minors.
(2) A covered online service is prohibited from using dark patterns
to subvert or impair covered minor autonomy, decisionmaking, or choice.
Sec. 7. Original sections 87-1301, 87-1302, 87-1305, and 87-1308,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-9-